J Physiol 577.2 (2006) pp 617–639

617

Modelling spinal circuitry involved in locomotor pattern
generation: insights from deletions during ﬁctive
locomotion

Ilya A. Rybak1, Natalia A. Shevtsova1,2, Myriam Lafreniere-Roula3 and David A. McCrea3

1Department of Neurobiology and Anatomy, Drexel University College of Medicine, Philadelphia, PA 19129, USA
2A. B. Kogan Research Institute for Neurocybernetics, Rostov State University, Rostov-on-Don 344090, Russia
3Spinal Cord Research Centre and Department of Physiology, University of Manitoba, Winnipeg, Manitoba R3E 3J7, Canada

The mammalian spinal cord contains a locomotor central pattern generator (CPG) that can
produce alternating rhythmic activity of ﬂexor and extensor motoneurones in the absence
of rhythmic input and proprioceptive feedback. During such ﬁctive locomotor activity in
decerebrate cats, spontaneous omissions of activity occur simultaneously in multiple agonist
motoneurone pools for a number of cycles. During these ‘deletions’, antagonist motoneurone
pools usually become tonically active but may also continue to be rhythmic. The rhythmic
activity that re-emerges following a deletion is often not phase shifted. This suggests that some
neuronal mechanism can maintain the locomotor period when motoneurone activity fails. To
account for these observations, a simpliﬁed computational model of the spinal circuitry has been
developed in which the locomotor CPG consists of two levels: a half-centre rhythm generator
(RG) and a pattern formation (PF) network, with reciprocal inhibitory interactions between
antagonist neural populations at each level. The model represents a network of interacting neural
populations with single interneurones and motoneurones described in the Hodgkin-Huxley
style. The model reproduces the range of locomotor periods and phase durations observed
during real locomotion in adult cats and permits independent control of the level of motoneurone
activity and of step cycle timing. By altering the excitability of neural populations within the
PF network, the model can reproduce deletions in which motoneurone activity fails but the
phase of locomotor oscillations is maintained. The model also suggests criteria for the functional
identiﬁcation of spinal interneurones involved in the mammalian locomotor pattern generation.

(Resubmitted 4 August 2006; accepted after revision 24 September 2006; ﬁrst published online 28 September 2006)
Corresponding author D. A. McCrea: Spinal Cord Research Centre, University of Manitoba, 730 William Avenue,
Winnipeg, Manitoba, R3E3J7 Canada. Email: dave@scrc.umanitoba.ca

Locomotor central pattern generator
in the mammalian spinal cord

It is widely accepted that the mammalian spinal cord
contains a central pattern generator (CPG) that can
produce the basic locomotor rhythm in the absence
of rhythmic input
from higher brain centres and
peripheral sensory feedback (Graham Brown, 1911;
Grillner, 1981; Rossignol, 1996; Orlovsky et al. 1999).
Although the neuronal organization of this CPG remains
largely unknown, there appears to be at least one CPG
for each hindlimb because the hindlimbs of cats with
chronic thoracic spinal lesions can step at independent
rates (Forssberg et al. 1980). Graham Brown (1914)
offered the ﬁrst conceptual scheme of the mammalian
CPG based on a half-centre concept. According to this
concept, the locomotor rhythm results from interplay

between tonic excitation of two populations of excitatory
interneurones (referred to as half-centres) and the
inhibition between them. Each half-centre
reciprocal
excites
synergist motoneurones
activates
antagonist motoneurones
interneurones
(e.g. Jankowska et al. 1967a,b; Lundberg, 1981). In this
organization, a single network controls the rhythm and
pattern of motoneurone activity during locomotion.

inhibiting

and

To overcome some of the inherent limitations of a single
CPG network and provide for a variety of motoneurone
recruitment patterns, Grillner (1981) suggested that
subsets of motoneurone pools are controlled by multiple,
coupled, unit burst generators (UBGs) (see also Stein
& Smith, 1997). Others have suggested that a bipartite
(half-centre) organization can also sculpt the activity
of individual motoneurone pools if additional neural
circuits operate between the rhythm generator (RG) and

C(cid:2) 2006 The Authors. Journal compilation C(cid:2) 2006 The Physiological Society

DOI: 10.1113/jphysiol.2006.118703

618

I. A. Rybak and others

J Physiol 577.2

motoneurones. Such intermediate neural circuits have
been proposed to reproduce the complex pattern of activity
in motoneurone pools innervating bifunctional muscles or
to provide a separation of the tasks of rhythm generation
and motoneurone activation during locomotion (Perret &
Cabelguen, 1980; Perret, 1983; Koshland & Smith, 1989;
Kriellaars et al. 1994; Burke et al. 2001).

Insights into CPG organization from experimental
studies of ﬁctive locomotion

stimulation of

Continuous electrical
the midbrain
locomotor region (MLR) in the immobilized decerebrate
cat produces ‘ﬁctive locomotion’ consisting of rhythmic
alternating activation of ﬂexor and extensor motoneurones
similar to that occurring during normal
locomotion
in the intact animal (see Rossignol, 1996). Two types
of experimental studies of ﬁctive locomotion in our
laboratory motivated the development of
the CPG
architecture presented here. The ﬁrst was an investigation
of the effects of stimulation of hindlimb sensory afferents
on motoneurone activity and step cycle timing (e.g.
Guertin et al. 1995; Perreault et al. 1995; McCrea, 2001;
Stecina et al. 2005). These studies revealed that in many
cases, afferent stimulation can delay or cause a premature
phase switching within the ongoing step cycle without
changing the timing of the following step cycles (see the
following paper, Rybak et al. 2006).

The other experimental ﬁndings that motivated the
present study came from an investigation of ‘deletions’
– spontaneous errors
in the rhythmic activity of
motoneurones occurring during ﬁctive locomotion and
scratch (Lafreniere-Roula & McCrea, 2005). Such deletions
of rhythmic motoneurone activity have been observed
during ﬁctive (e.g. Grillner & Zangger, 1979) and treadmill
locomotion in cats (e.g. Duysens, 1977) and extensively
described in turtles during the scratch reﬂex (e.g. Stein
& Grossman, 1980; Stein, 2005). Deletions observed
during ﬁctive locomotion in cats are characterized by
brief periods of inactivity occurring simultaneously in
multiple synergist motoneurone populations. During
these deletions, the activity of antagonist motoneurone
populations usually becomes tonic but may continue
to be rhythmic (Lafreniere-Roula & McCrea, 2005).
The widespread effect of deletions on the activity of
multiple motoneurone pools throughout the limb is strong
evidence that they are produced by failures in the operation
of some common spinal circuitry, such as the CPG, and
not a result of local perturbations affecting the excitability
of particular motoneurones.

An analysis of motoneurone activities during and
following deletions revealed that some deletions are
the rhythm which
accompanied by a resetting of
can be recognized by a shift
the
re-emerging rhythm relative to the rhythm preceding

in the phase of

the deletion (Lafreniere-Roula & McCrea, 2005). Such
rhythm resetting or phase shifting after a deletion
can be easily explained within the framework of the
classical half-centre CPG organization. For example,
because of reciprocal inhibition between the half-centres, a
spontaneous temporary increase in the excitability of one
half-centre would cause an inhibition of the antagonist
half-centre, resulting in a deletion of the activity of
the corresponding antagonist motoneurone pools. As the
duration of the perturbation causing the deletion may be
arbitrary, the rhythm following the perturbation should
generally be accompanied by a shift of the phase of the
post-deletion rhythm relative to the pre-deletion rhythm.
Most spontaneous deletions observed during ﬁctive
locomotion are characterized, however, by a maintenance
of the phase of locomotor oscillations after the deletion
(Lafreniere-Roula & McCrea, 2005). Thus the bursts of
motoneurone activity that re-emerge after a deletion often
occur at an integer number of the missing locomotor
periods. In other words, the post-deletion motoneurone
bursts appear at the times which would have been expected
if the deletion had not occurred (i.e. the locomotor
rhythm is not reset) (Lafreniere-Roula & McCrea, 2005).
These observations suggest that the internal structure of
the CPG can ‘remember’ and maintain the locomotor
cycle period when motoneurone activity falls silent. Such
rhythm and phase maintenance is inconsistent with the
classical half-centre CPG organization, in which a single
network is responsible for both rhythm generation and
motoneurone activation.

The present study explores a novel architecture of
the locomotor CPG that incorporates features of both
the half-centre and the UBG organizations. In order
to explain the above experimental ﬁndings, we suggest
that the locomotor CPG has a two-level architecture
containing a half-centre RG, performing a ‘clock’ function,
and an intermediate pattern formation (PF) network
that distributes and coordinates the activities of multiple
motoneurone populations (see Fig. 1). The RG deﬁnes the
locomotor rhythm and durations of ﬂexor and extensor
phases. It also controls the activity of the PF network
interposed between the RG and motoneurones. The PF
network contains multiple interneurone populations each
of which projects to multiple synergist motoneurone
populations and reciprocally inhibits other populations
within the PF network. Depending on the input from
the RG network and the interactions within the PF
network, each PF population is active during a particular
phase(s) of the step cycle and produces a phase-speciﬁc
synchronized activation of the corresponding group of
synergist motoneurone pools (see Fig. 1).

The hypothesized two-level organization of the CPG
the locomotor rhythm
the RG level) and the pattern of motoneurone
the PF level). Consequently, sensory

allows a separate control of
(at
activations (at

C(cid:2) 2006 The Authors. Journal compilation C(cid:2) 2006 The Physiological Society

J Physiol 577.2

Modelling spinal circuitry involved in locomotor pattern generation

619

signals or a spontaneously occurring perturbation may
affect CPG operation at
the RG level, altering the
locomotor rhythm (e.g. producing a phase shift or rhythm
resetting) or act at the PF level, altering the pattern of
motoneurone activation without resetting the rythm or
shifting the phase (see Fig. 1). In the present report we
describe a computational model representing a reduced
version of the above conceptual model and compare
the results of modelling with the experimental study of
deletions observed during MLR-evoked ﬁctive locomotion
in decerebrate cats. Modelling the effects of afferent
stimulation on the locomotor rhythm and pattern is
presented in the following paper (Rybak et al. 2006). Some
results have been presented in abstract form (Rybak et al.
2004a; Rybak & McCrea, 2005).

Figure 1. Schematic illustration of the two-level central pattern
generator (CPG) concept
The locomotor CPG consists of a half-centre rhythm generator (RG)
and a pattern formation (PF) network. The RG deﬁnes the locomotor
rhythm and the durations of ﬂexor and extensor phases and controls
the activity of the PF network. The PF network contains interneurone
populations (green spheres), each of which provides excitation to
multiple synergist motoneurone pools (diamonds) and is connected
with other PF populations via a network of inhibitory connections.
Activation of a particular PF population activates the corresponding
muscle synergy. The PF network mediates rhythmic input from the RG
to motoneurones and distributes it among the motoneurone pools.
Depending on the input from the RG and the interactions within the
PF network, each PF population is active within particular phase(s) of
the step cycle and produces a phase-speciﬁc, synchronized activation
of the corresponding group of synergist motoneurone pools. Afferent
feedback and spontaneous perturbations may affect the CPG either at
the level of the RG, producing alterations (e.g. phase shifting or
resetting) of the locomotor rhythm, or at the level of PF, altering the
level of motoneurone activation and/or the timing of phase transitions
without shifting the phase of (or resetting) the locomotor rhythm
generated by the RG. See details in the text.

C(cid:2) 2006 The Authors. Journal compilation C(cid:2) 2006 The Physiological Society

Methods

Models of single motoneurones and interneurones

have

channel

as
had

conductances)

Interneurones were

All neurones were modelled in the Hodgkin-Huxley
simulated
style.
single-
compartment models. Motoneurones
two
compartments: soma and dendrite. In this study, we
accepted and used the two-compartment motoneurone
model described by Booth et al. (1997). In accordance
with this model, the following ionic currents (with the
corresponding
been
considered: fast sodium (I Na with maximal conductance
¯gNa); delayed-rectiﬁer potassium (I K with maximal
¯gK);
calcium-N (I CaN with maximal
conductance
¯gCaN); calcium-L (I CaL with maximal
conductance
conductance ¯gCaL), calcium-dependent potassium (I K,Ca
¯gK,Ca), and leakage (I L
with maximal conductance
with constant conductance g L) currents. In addition,
based on evidence for the presence of the persistent
(slowly inactivating) sodium current (I NaP) in spinal cord
interneurones and motoneurones (Lee & Heckman, 2001;
Darbon et al. 2004; Streit et al. 2005), this current has
been also included in our neurone models (with maximal
conductance ¯gNaP). The above ionic currents are described
as follows:

Na

× hNa × (V − ENa);
× (V − EK);

INa = ¯gNa × m3
INaP = ¯gNaP × mNaP × hNaP × (V − ENa);
IK = ¯gK × m4
ICaN = ¯gCaN × m2
× hCaN × (V − ECa);
ICaL = ¯gCaL × mCaL × (V − ECa);
IK,Ca = ¯gK,Ca × mK,Ca
× (V − EK);
IL = gL × (V − EL),

CaN

K

(1)

where V is the membrane potential of the corresponding
neurone compartment (i.e. soma (V (S)) or dendrite
(V (D))) in two-compartment models, or the neurone
membrane potential V in one-compartment models; ENa,
EK, ECa and EL are the reversal potentials for sodium,
potassium, calcium and leakage currents, respectively;
variables m and h with indices indicating ionic currents
represent, respectively, the activation and inactivation
variables of the corresponding ionic channels.

The

dendrite–soma

(with
conductance g C) for soma (I C(S)) and dendrite (I C(D)) are
described following the Booth et al. (1997) model:

coupling

currents

× (V(S) − V(D));

IC(S) = gC
p
IC(D) = gC
1 − p

× (V(D) − V(S)),

(2)

where p is the parameter deﬁning the ratio of somatic
surface area to total surface area.

620

I. A. Rybak and others

J Physiol 577.2

Synaptic excitatory (I SynE with conductance g SynE
and reversal potential ESynE) and inhibitory (I SynI with
conductance g SynI and reversal potential ESynI) currents
have also been incorporated into our models:
ISynE = gSynE × (V − ESynE);
ISynI = gSynI × (V − ESynI).

(3)

The kinetics of intracellular Ca2+
concentration (Ca,
described separately for each compartment) is modelled
according to the following equation (Booth et al. 1997):

Ca = f × (−α × ICa − kCa × Ca),

(4)

d
dt

where f deﬁnes the percentage of free to total Ca2+
converts the total Ca2+
and kCa represents the Ca2+

current, I Ca, to Ca2+
removal rate.

, α
concentration

In accordance with the two-compartment motoneurone
model of Booth et al. (1997) but with the inclusion of I NaP
to the motoneurone dendrite, the membrane potentials
of the motoneurone soma (V (S)) and dendrite (V (D)) are
described by the following differential equations:
C × dV(S)
dt

= −INa(S) − IK(S) − ICaN(S)
−IK,Ca(S) − IL(S) − IC(S);

C × dV(D)
dt

= −INaP(D) − ICaN(D) − ICaL(D) − IK,Ca(D)

−IL(D) − IC(D) − ISynE − ISynI,

(5)

where C is the membrane capacitance and t is time.

For simplicity and because of the lack of speciﬁc data,
all interneurones (single-compartment models) except
RG and PF neurons contain only a minimal set of ionic
currents:

C × dV
dt

= −INa − IK − IL − ISynE − ISynI.

(6)

The excitatory neurons of the CPG comprising the RG and
PF populations have the persistent (slowly inactivating)
sodium current, I NaP, which has been suggested to play an
important role in the intrinsic rhythmogenesis in spinal
interneurones (Darbon et al. 2004; Streit et al. 2005). The
membrane potential of these interneurones is described as
follows:

C × dV
dt

= −INa − INaP − IK − IL − ISynE − ISynI.

(7)

Activation m and inactivation h of voltage-dependent
) are
ionic channels (e.g. Na

, K

2+

2+

, CaN

, NaP

, CaL

+

+

+

described by the following differential equations:

(8)

mi = m∞i (V ) − mi ;
hi = h∞i (V ) − hi ,

τmi (V ) × d
dt
τhi (V ) × d
dt
identiﬁes the name of the channel, m∞i(V )
where i
and h∞i(V ) deﬁne the voltage-dependent steady-state
activation and inactivation, respectively, and τ mi(V ) and
τ hi(V ) deﬁne the corresponding time constants (see
Table 1 in Appendix). Activation of the sodium channels
is considered to be instantaneous (τ mNa = τ mNaP = 0, see
Booth et al. 1997; Butera et al. 1999a,b).
Activation of the Ca2+

-dependent potassium channels
is also considered instantaneous and described as follows
(Booth et al. 1997):

Ca

mK,Ca =
the Ca2+

Ca + Kd
concentration within the
where Ca is
corresponding compartment or neurone, and K d deﬁnes
the half-saturation level of this conductance.

(9)

,

The excitatory (g SynE) and inhibitory synaptic (g SynI)
conductances are equal to zero at rest and may be
activated (opened) by the excitatory or inhibitory inputs,
respectively:
gSynEi(t) = ¯gE × (cid:2)

m

(10)
where the function S{x} = x, if x ≥ 0, and 0 if x < 0.
The excitatory and inhibitory synaptic conductances in
equation (10) (gSyEi(t) and gSynIi(t), respectively) have
two terms. The ﬁrst term describes the integrated effect
of inputs from other neurones in the network. The second
term describes the integrated effect of inputs from external
drive or afferent stimulation dmi (e.g. MLR drive or sensory
input from peripheral afferents; see also Rybak et al. 1997,
2003). Each spike arriving to neurone i from neurone j
at time t kj increases the excitatory synaptic conductance
by ¯gE × w ji if the synaptic weight w ji > 0, or increases
the inhibitory synaptic conductance by – ¯gI × w ji if the
synaptic weight w ji < 0. ¯gE and ¯gI are the parameters
deﬁning an increase in the excitatory or inhibitory synaptic
conductance, respectively, produced by one arriving spike
at|w ji| = 1. τ SynE and τ SynE are the decay time constants for
the excitatory and inhibitory conductances, respectively.
In the second terms of eqn (10), ¯gEd and ¯gId are the
parameters deﬁning the increase in the excitatory or

C(cid:2) 2006 The Authors. Journal compilation C(cid:2) 2006 The Physiological Society

j

<t

+ ¯gEd × (cid:2)

gSyn I i (t) = ¯gI × (cid:2)

m

j

<t

+ ¯gId × (cid:2)

S{w ji} × exp(−(t − tk j )/τSynE)
S{wdmi} × dmi ;
S{−w ji} × exp(−(t − tk j )/τSynI)
S{−wdmi} × dmi ,

(cid:2)
(cid:2)
J Physiol 577.2

Modelling spinal circuitry involved in locomotor pattern generation

621

inhibitory synaptic conductance, respectively, produced
by external input drive dmi = 1 with a synaptic weight of
|wdmi| = 1.
The values of maximal channel conductances and other
ﬁxed parameters of neurone models are speciﬁed in the
Appendix.

Modelling neural populations

In the present model, each functional type of neurone is
represented by a population of 20 neurones. Connections
between the populations were established such that if
population A was assigned to receive an excitatory or
inhibitory input from population B or external drive
D, then each neurone in population A received the
corresponding excitatory or inhibitory synaptic input
from each neurone in population B or from drive D,
respectively. The heterogeneity of neurones within each
population was set by a random distribution of EL (see
mean values± s.d. in Appendix) and initial conditions for
values of membrane potential, calcium concentrations and
channel conductances. In all simulations, initial conditions
were chosen randomly from a uniform distribution for
each variable, and a settling period of 20 s was allowed
in each simulation before data were collected. Each
simulation was repeated 20–30 times, and demonstrated
qualitatively similar behaviour for particular values of
EL and initial conditions taken within the standard
deviations.

Computer simulations

All simulations were performed using a simulation
package NSM 2.0 (for Windows XP) developed at Drexel
University by I. A. Rybak, S. N. Markin and N. A. Shevtsova.
Differential equations were solved using the exponential
Euler integration method (MacGregor, 1987) with a step
of 0.1 ms (further details in Rybak et al. 2003).

Recordings from ﬁctive locomotion preparations

simulations

comparisons

locomotion were
of

This investigation sought to simulate the activity of
motoneurones observed during ﬁctive locomotion in
decerebrate cats previously described by Lafreniere-Roula
& McCrea (2005). No new animal data on motoneurone
activity during ﬁctive
collected.
Instead
from the
present model were made with records of electro-
neurogram (ENG) activity and intracellular recordings
from hindlimb motoneurones during ﬁctive locomotion
obtained previously (e.g. Lafreniere-Roula & McCrea,
2005). Brieﬂy,
those recordings were obtained from
precollicular–postmammillary decerebrate cats in which
all cortex and rostral brainstem regions were removed
before discontinuing the anaesthetic. Surgical and
experimental protocols were in compliance with the
guidelines set out by the Canadian Council on Animal

C(cid:2) 2006 The Authors. Journal compilation C(cid:2) 2006 The Physiological Society

region (MLR)

Care and the University of Manitoba. Fictive locomotion
was evoked by electrical stimulation of the midbrain
locomoter
following neuromuscular
blockade. ENG records were rectiﬁed and integrated
before digitization at 500 Hz and intracellular recordings
from lumbar motoneurones were made using sharp glass
microelectrodes (for further details, see Lafreniere-Roula
& McCrea, 2005). The records in Figs. 9A, 10A, and 11A
are taken from Lafreniere-Roula & McCrea (2005) and
are used by permission from the American Physiological
Society.

Results

Modelling spinal circuits with a two-level
locomotor CPG

Because the internal organization of the mammalian CPG
remains unknown, our primary goal was to create a
model that could demonstrate an important subset of the
characteristics of activity seen during ﬁctive locomotion in
decerebrate cats. The speciﬁc features of locomotion that
the model should be able to reproduce were the following.
(1) Tonic drive (e.g. constant MLR stimulation) to the
CPG should evoke rhythmic activity with two alternating
phases (‘ﬂexion’ and ‘extension’) coupled without inter-
vening quiescent periods. (2) The model should be able to
generate locomotor step cycle periods (T) in the range
of 0.4–1.5 s and ratios of ﬂexor (T F) or extensor (T E)
duration to the period (T F/T and T E/T) in the range
of 0.25–0.75, observed during ﬁctive locomotion (e.g.
Yakovenko et al. 2005). (3) Locomotor speed should
increase (i.e. the period decrease) with increasing MLR
drive (Sirota & Shik, 1973). (4) In the absence of
MLR drive, an increase in excitability of CPG neurons
should produce a slow locomotor-like activity (T = 2–5 s)
similar to that evoked by intravenous administration of
monoamine precursors
in cats in vivo (e.g. Jankowska
et al. 1967a,b), or by 5-HT in the neonatal rodent
isolated spinal cord (e.g. Cowley & Schmidt, 1995; Whelan,
2003). (5) A blockade of synaptic inhibition should
trigger synchronized oscillations of ﬂexors and extensors
(e.g. Noga et al. 1993; Cowley & Schmidt, 1995; Beato &
Nistri, 1999).

the

A consideration of the above features led us to the
suggestion that the RG half-centres contain populations
of neurons with intrinsic rhythmogenic properties inter-
connected via mutual excitatory connections within
and between the half-centres and that the generation
of
rhythm involves both intrinsic
rhythmogenic mechanisms, allowing each half-centre
to generate
rhythmic activity on its own under
certain conditions, and reciprocal inhibitory interactions
between the half-centres. While the intrinsic mechanisms
deﬁning rhythmogenic properties of CPG neurons remain
unknown, there is indirect evidence for the role of

locomotor

622

I. A. Rybak and others

J Physiol 577.2

persistent (or slowly inactivating) sodium current, I NaP,
in rhythmogenesis. This current is found in spinal cord
motoneurones and interneurones (e.g. Lee & Heckman,
2001; Darbon et al. 2004; Streit et al. 2005) and its blockade
by riluzole abolishes intrinsic cellular oscillations and
rhythm generation in the networks of cultured rat spinal
cord neurons (Darbon et al. 2004; Streit et al. 2005). Slowly
inactivating I NaP has also been found to play a major role
in the respiratory rhythm generation in the pre-B¨otzinger
complex in vitro (Butera et al. 1999a,b) and, under certain
conditions, in vivo (Rybak et al. 2004b). Based on this
indirect evidence, we incorporated I NaP into the neurons
comprising the CPG excitatory populations to provide
them with intrinsic rhythmogenic properties similar to
those described in the models of the respiratory CPG by
Butera et al. (1999b) and Rybak et al. (2003).

The ability of neurones with NaP channels to generate
endogenous oscillations is deﬁned by the ratio of the
maximal conductance of NaP channels to the maximum
conductance of potassium leak (Del Negro et al. 2002)
and voltage-gated potassium (Rybak et al. 2003) channels.
If maximal conductances of leak and potassium channels
are ﬁxed, then in order for a neurone to generate
bursting activity,
the maximal conductance of NaP
channels should exceed some critical value. In our model,
the average value for the maximal conductance for
NaP channels in PF neurones was set less than that
−2, see
in RG neurones (0.1 mS cm
Appendix) and speciﬁcally below the level allowing the
expression of NaP-dependent rhythmogenic properties
under normal conditions. Therefore under normal
conditions in our model, the PF network cannot generate
its own oscillations, but operates in a forced mode receiving
oscillatory inputs from the RG. We assume that this
regime corresponds to normal in vivo conditions which
we intended to model in this work.

−2 versus 0.25 mS cm

Our central hypothesis is that the locomotor CPG has
two functional levels: a half-centre RG and an intermediate
PF network that distributes and coordinates the activities
of multiple motoneurone populations under control of
the RG (see Fig. 1). The schematic of the computational
model explored in the present study is shown in Fig. 2A.
To maintain the analogy with the experimental data in
decerebrate cats, locomotion is initiated in the model
by external tonic excitation (from the ‘MLR’) that is
distributed among the excitatory neural populations of
the CPG (RG and PF networks). The RG consists of
two populations (RG-E and RG-F) of excitatory neurones
with I NaP-dependent pacemaker properties and mutual
excitatory synaptic connections within and between
them. Mutual inhibition between the RG-E and RG-F
populations is mediated by the extensor and ﬂexor
inhibitory populations (Inrg-E and Inrg-F, respectively).
In the absence of
the alternating
busting activities of RG-E and RG-F populations deﬁne

sensory input,

the locomotor
the extensor and ﬂexor phases of
cycle, respectively. The activity of
these populations
is controlled by MLR excitatory drive, I NaP-dependent
subthreshold activation, mutual synaptic excitation within
and between the RG-E and RG-F populations, and mutual
inhibition mediated by the inhibitory Inrg-E and Inrg-F
populations.

the model

The PF network represents the second level of the
CPG. According to our theoretical concept (see Fig. 1),
this network should contain multiple PF populations
controlled by the RG and provide phase-dependent
activation of
the corresponding groups of synergist
motoneurone populations including the populations
activating bifunctional muscles (acting across more
in the reduced version
than one joint). However
of
the PF network
contains only two neural populations, PF-E and
PF-F (see Fig. 2A). These populations receive tonic
excitatory drive from the MLR, a weak excitatory
input from the homonymous RG population, strong
inhibition from the opposite RG population via a
corresponding inhibitory population (Inrg-E or Inrg-F),
and reciprocal inhibition from the opposite PF population
via another inhibitory population (Inpf-F or Inpf-E)
(see Fig. 2A).

considered here,

Alternating activity of the RG populations results
in periodic, alternating activity of the PF-E and PF-F
populations. The PF populations transmit alternating
rhythmic excitation to the extensor (Mn-E) and ﬂexor
(Mn-F) motoneurones and to inhibitory extensor (Ia-E)
and ﬂexor (Ia-F) interneurones (Fig. 2A). These Ia
populations form a third level of reciprocal inhibition
in the system. In the model they provide the rhythmic
inhibition of motoneurone populations during the
inactive phase of the step cycle (e.g. McCrea et al. 1980;
Shefchyk & Jordan, 1985). According to our concept
and in agreement with previous suggestions (Pratt &
Jordan, 1987; Orlovsky et al. 1999), these ‘local’ reciprocal
interactions between the direct antagonists sculpt the
ﬁring patterns of individual motoneurone pools. During
in the presence of afferent
normal
feedback),
reﬂex,
antagonist
group
motoneurones
Jankowska,
1992). The model also includes populations of extensor
and ﬂexor Renshaw cells, R-E and R-F, respectively, which
receive collateral excitatory input from the corresponding
motoneurone populations (Mn-E and Mn-F) and provide
feedback inhibition to the homonymous motoneurones.
The circuitry of mutual inhibition between Ia-E and Ia-F
populations, their inhibition by Renshaw cells and the
mutual inhibition between Renshaw cells (see Fig. 2A)
is in accord with the extensive work done on these
interneurones in anaesthetized preparations (references
in Jankowska, 1992). Unlike previous proposals (Miller

locomotion (i.e.

of
1981;

Lundberg,

Ia

interneurones

also mediate

(e.g.

Ia,

reciprocal

inhibition

C(cid:2) 2006 The Authors. Journal compilation C(cid:2) 2006 The Physiological Society

J Physiol 577.2

Modelling spinal circuitry involved in locomotor pattern generation

623

& Scott, 1977), the Ia and Renshaw populations do not
participate in the maintenance or generation of rhythm
(discussed in McCrea et al. 1980; Noga et al. 1987).

The weights of synaptic connections between the neural
populations in our model are shown in Table 2 (see
Appendix).

Figure 2B and C shows examples of

computer
simulations of locomotor rhythm generation and ﬂexor
and extensor motoneurone activity. Activity is represented
by histograms of average neurone activity in the
population. The basic locomotor rhythm is generated
by the RG network. The alternating rhythmic bursts of
the RG populations (top two traces of Fig. 2B and C)
deﬁne the durations of extensor and ﬂexor phases and
hence the locomotor cycle period. An increase in MLR
excitation to one RG population reduces the opposite
phase duration (see below). In Fig. 2B the MLR drive
to RG-E is stronger than that to RG-F, resulting in a
longer duration extensor phase. In Fig. 2C increased drive
to the RG-F population results in a ﬂexor-dominated

rhythm. Note that because of the separation of rhythm
generating and motoneurone activating networks, the
average ﬁring rates of the motoneurone populations (two
lower traces in Fig. 2B and C) are similar in the extensor-
and ﬂexor-dominated rhythms. In the reduced model
considered here, in which the PF network consists of
only two (extensor and ﬂexor) populations reciprocally
inhibiting each other, the activity of each PF population
closely follows the activity of the corresponding RG
population, and the activities of Ia inhibitory inter-
neurones, motoneurones and Renshaw cells follow the
activity of the corresponding (extensor or ﬂexor) PF
populations (see Fig. 2B and C). The rhythmic activity of Ia
and Renshaw cells during ﬁctive locomotion in the absence
of sensory feedback has been previously demonstrated
(Feldman & Orlovsky, 1975; McCrea et al. 1980; Pratt &
Jordan, 1987).

Figure 3A illustrates the mechanisms for the locomotor
rhythm generation induced by excitatory (MLR) drive
to the CPG. The top three traces in this ﬁgure show,

Figure 2. Model schematic and performance
A, schematic of the model. Populations of interneurones are represented by spheres. Excitatory and inhibitory
synaptic connections are shown by arrows and small circles, respectively. Populations of motoneurones are
represented by diamonds. See explanations in the text. B and C, model performance: the locomotor patterns
generated by the model. Activity of each population is represented by a histogram of average ﬁring frequency
(number of spikes per second per neurone, bin = 30 ms). In B, the MLR drive to RG-E (drg-e) population is larger
than to RG-F population (drg-f = 0.43; drg-e = 0.5), and the model generates a rhythm with a longer duration
extensor phase (T E > T F). In C, the RG-F population receives a larger drive (drg-f = 0.51; drg-e = 0.45), and the
model generates a ﬂexion-dominated rhythm (T F > T E).

C(cid:2) 2006 The Authors. Journal compilation C(cid:2) 2006 The Physiological Society

624

I. A. Rybak and others

J Physiol 577.2

respectively: the average histogram of neurone activity in
the RG-F population, the membrane potential trajectory
of a single neurone from this population, and the change
in the inactivation variable for NaP channel (hNaP, see
eqn (1)) in this neurone. The next three traces show
the same variables for the RG-E population. The ﬁgure
shows that during the phase of activity of each RG
population, the I NaP in neurones of this population
is inactivating (see the slow reduction of hNaP). The
ﬁring activity of the population is, however, maintained
because of the supra-threshold activation of the fast
sodium current. At the same time, there is an increasing
excitability of the opposite (inactive) RG population
due to the slowly increasing hNaP (i.e. de-inactivation
of I NaP). At some point, the most excitable neurones
in the previously silent RG population start ﬁring.
Mutual excitatory connections within the population
further increase population excitability and synchronize
neuronal activation. Firing in this RG population
activates the corresponding Inrg inhibitory population
(see traces
in
the previously
Fig. 3A) which reciprocally inhibits
active RG population and thus produces locomotor
phase switching. Repetition of these processes produces
alternating ﬁring bursts of RG-E and RG-F populations

Inrg-F and Inrg-E populations

for

and alternating activities of the extensor and ﬂexor
motoneurone
bottom
traces).

populations

(see

Fig. 3A,

the generation of

As described above,

locomotor
rhythm in the model results from a combination of
I NaP-dependent intrinsic mechanisms operating within
each RG population, and the reciprocal inhibition between
these populations. Speciﬁcally, the onset of bursts is
critically dependent on intrinsic excitatory mechanisms
(activation of I NaP), whereas burst termination is mostly
deﬁned by the reciprocal inhibition. As a result, step cycle
duration (locomotor period) is dependent upon (and may
be regulated by) the external (MLR) drive to the RG and
the reciprocal inhibition between the RG half-centres, as
well as by the intrinsic characteristics of NaP channels in
RG neurons. Figure 4Aa shows that locomotor period T
decreases monotonically with an increase of MLR drive
(consistent with the data of Sirota & Shik, 1973) and
Fig. 4Ab shows the shortening of cycle period with an
increase of reciprocal (mutual) inhibition between the
RG half-centres. At the same time, T decreases mono-
tonically with an increase of the maximal conductance
of NaP channels in RG neurons (Fig. 4Ac) and increases
linearly with an increase of the time constant for NaP
channel inactivation (Fig. 4Ad).

Figure 3. Rhythm generator performance under different conditions
A, generation of rhythmic activity evoked by supraspinal (MLR) drive to the RG (drg-f = 0.51; drg-e = 0.45).
B, imitation of pharmacologically evoked rhythm in the model. The slow rhythmic activity was produced by an
increase in excitability of the excitatory CPG populations (RGs and PFs) in the absence of external (MLR) drive.
The increase of excitability was produced by a 6 mV depolarization of the average leakage reversal potential in
all neurons of these populations. C, rhythmic activity produced in the model by disinhibiton. To simulate this
behaviour, the weights of all inhibitory connections in the model were set to zero. Note synchronized rhythmic
bursts of ﬂexors and extensors. See details in the text.

C(cid:2) 2006 The Authors. Journal compilation C(cid:2) 2006 The Physiological Society

J Physiol 577.2

Modelling spinal circuitry involved in locomotor pattern generation

625

In order to investigate the relative durations of the
locomotor phases produced by the model, the MLR drive
to one RG population (RG-E in Fig. 4Ba–Bd) was held
constant (at 0.52 in Fig. 4Ba and Bc and at 0.41 in
panels Fig. 4Bb and Bd), while the drive to the other RG
population (RG-F) was progressively increased. Increasing
MLR drive to one of the RG populations produced only
small changes in the burst duration of that population
and hence the duration of the corresponding locomotor
phase (ﬂexor in the example shown), but substantially
reduced the duration of the opposite (extensor) phase
and, correspondingly, the total duration of the step
cycle. As seen in Fig. 4Ba–Bd, the model was able to
generate MLR-evoked oscillations with step cycle period
T = 0.4–2.5 s and ratio of phase durations to the period
T F/T (or T E/T) = 0.21–0.79 that span the range of step
cycle periods and phase durations observed during ﬁctive
locomotion in decerebrate cats (Yakovenko et al. 2005).

The results of our attempts to model oscillations under
other conditions with no external MLR drive are shown
in Fig. 3B and C. To model oscillations produced by
monoamine neuromodulators, we suggest that neuro-
modulators increase the excitability of CPG excitatory
populations (RGs and PFs). This suggestion is consistent
with the data of Fedirchuk & Dai (2004) showing that
monoamines (5-HT and noradrenaline) increase the
excitability of spinal neurones in the rat via a 2–7 mV
reduction in the threshold for action potential production.
The mechanism of such an increase of excitability may
leak conductance
also involve the inhibition of K
(e.g. Kjaerulff & Kiehn, 2001; Perrier et al. 2003). To
imitate the pharmacological increase of excitability in our
model, the average leakage current reversal potential EL
was depolarized in all excitatory CPG neurone populations
(RG and PF). Figure 3B shows that a depolarization of
EL by 6 mV in the model (in the absence of MLR drive)
evoked slow locomotor-like oscillations with alternating
ﬂexor and extensor activities and T = ∼5 s.

+

In our model the inhibitory interneurone populations,
Inrg-F and Inrg-E, have a low level background activity
between the RG-driven bursts. At rest this activity normally
prevents CPG network operation in the absence of MLR
drive. To simulate the oscillations evoked by blocking
inhibitory transmission, the weights of all
inhibitory
connections in the model were set to zero. This produced
spontaneous bursting activity in which ﬂexor and extensor
motoneurones are co-active (see Fig. 3C). Such activity

constant (drg-e = 0.52 in Ba and Bc, and drg-e = 0.41 in Bb and Bd).
Drive to RG-F (drg-f) was progressively increased from 0.32 to 0.52 in
Ba and Bc, and from 0.31 to 0.51 in Bb and Bd, see the horizontal
axes in Ba–Bd. Note that an increase of MLR drive to RG-F produces
only small changes in the duration of the ﬂexor phase, but
substantially reduces the duration of the extensor phase and,
correspondingly, the total duration of the step cycle.

Figure 4. Durations of locomotor phases and step cycle and
their dependence on model parameters
Aa, increased drive to the RG populations reduces step cycle duration
(T) (a symmetrical case is considered: drg-f = drg-e = 0.32–0.52, see
the horizontal axis). Ab, T monotonically increases with an increase in
mutual inhibition between the RG populations. The increase of mutual
inhibition was imposed by increasing the absolute value of the weight
of inhibitory synaptic input from Inrg-E to RG-E and from Inrg-F to
RG-F, which is indicated in the horizontal axis (see Fig. 2A). Ac, T
monotonically decreases with an increase of the maximal conductance
of NaP channels in RG neurons ( ¯gNaP) whose value is indicated in the
horizontal axis. Ad, T linearly increases with an increasing maximal
time constant for NaP channel inactivation (τ hNaPmax) indicated in the
horizontal axis. In Ab–Ad, drg-f = drg-e = 0.42. Ba–Bd, the duration of
step cycle and locomotor phases (T, T F and T E in Ba and Bb) and the
relative durations of locomotor phases (T F/T and T E/T in Bc and Bd)
produced by the model. MLR drive to the RG-E population was
maintained

C(cid:2) 2006 The Authors. Journal compilation C(cid:2) 2006 The Physiological Society

626

I. A. Rybak and others

J Physiol 577.2

is qualitatively consistent with the experimental data
obtained in the rat isolated spinal cord (Cowley & Schmidt,
1995; Bracci et al. 1996; Beato & Nistri, 1999) and during
ﬁctive locomotion in cats (Noga et al. 1993) using blockers
of inhibitory synaptic transmission such as bicuculline and
strychnine.

activities

of

and

ﬂexor

in the model

Figure 5 shows a comparison of modelled and
experimental
extensor
motoneurones during locomotion. The average spiking
frequency of motoneurones
reaches
−1 (top and fourth traces in Fig. 5A) which is
40 spikes s
in general agreement with motoneurone ﬁring during
ﬁctive locomotion in the cat (e.g. Brownstone et al. 1992).
At the same time, because of the random distribution
of motoneurone parameters within each population
(speciﬁcally EL),
there are differences in the ﬁring
frequency, ﬁring duration and recruitment of individual
motoneurones (see raster plots, second and ﬁfth traces in
Fig. 5A). Similar to the intracellular recordings from single
motoneurones during ﬁctive locomotion, motoneurones
in the model are hyperpolarized from their resting level
(horizontal dashed lines in the third and bottom traces
in Fig. 5A) during the phase in which they are inactive.
Fig. 5B shows records from a bout of MLR-evoked
ﬁctive locomotion in a decerebrate cat plotted at the
same time scale as the modelled results in Fig. 5A. The

third and bottom traces are simultaneous intracellular
recordings from a hip ﬂexor (sartorius (Sart)) and a hip
extensor (semimembranosus or anterior biceps (SmAB))
motoneurone, respectively. The remaining traces are
population records (rectiﬁed, integrated neurograms) of
ﬂexor (hip, Sart, and ankle, tibialis anterior (TA)) and
extensor (hip, SmAB, and ankle, medial gastrocnemius
(MG)) motoneurone pool activities. A comparison of
the left and right panels in Fig. 5 shows that the patterns
of population activity of motoneurones and the traces
of membrane potentials (and ﬁring patterns) of single
motoneurones in the model are qualitatively similar to
those seen during ﬁctive locomotion.

Modelling deletions

As described in the Introduction, deletions are brief
failures in the alternating rhythmic activity of ﬂexor
and extensor motoneurones that occur spontaneously
during ﬁctive locomotion. During deletions the activity of
multiple agonist motoneurone populations is missing for
some period of time while the activity of their antagonists
becomes tonic or continues to be rhythmic. Using our
model, we suggest that deletions result from additional
excitatory or inhibitory drive that changes the excitability
of particular CPG populations.

Figure 5. Motoneurone activities in the model and in the cat
A, examples of population activities of ﬂexor and extensor motoneurones and membrane potential traces of
single motoneurones in the model. Activities of ﬂexor and extensor populations are represented by the average
histograms (top trace for Mn-F and fourth trace for Mn-E) and raster plots (second trace for Mn-F and ﬁfth trace for
Mn-E). In both raster plots, the lines correspond to single motoneurones arranged by neurone numbers from 1 to
20, and the dots in each line represent spikes. Membrane potentials of one ﬂexor and one extensor motoneurone
are shown in third and bottom traces, respectively, with action potentials truncated at the level of −10 mV. In this
simulation, the MLR drive to RG-F (drg-f) was 0.52 and to RG-E (drg-e) 0.46. B, records during MLR-evoked ﬁctive
locomotion showing electroneurogram (ENG) activity of ankle (tibialis anterior, TA) and hip (sartorius, Sart) ﬂexors,
ankle (medial gastrocnemius, MG) and hip (semimembranosus combined with anterior biceps, SmAB) extensors,
and simultaneous intracellular recordings from a Sart and an SmAB motoneurone.

C(cid:2) 2006 The Authors. Journal compilation C(cid:2) 2006 The Physiological Society

J Physiol 577.2

Modelling spinal circuitry involved in locomotor pattern generation

627

Figure 6A shows the results of our simulations in
which an additional drive temporarily affects one of the
RG populations. In this example, increased excitatory
drive to RG-E (see the top trace in Fig. 6A) produces
sustained activity in the RG-E half-centre and substantially
reduces (or eliminates) activity in the opposite (RG-F)
half-centre. As a result, at the motoneurone level (two
bottom traces in Fig. 6A), there is a deletion of ﬂexor
motoneurone activity with a sustained activity of extensor
motoneurones. A similar deletion of ﬂexor motoneurone
activity can be produced by temporarily reducing (or
eliminating) excitatory drive to the ﬂexor half-centre (see
Fig. 6B). What is important to note in both Fig. 6A and B
is that the onset and offset of the temporary change in RG
excitability could occur at an arbitrary time with respect
to the locomotor rhythm. Therefore, the post-deletion
rhythm should be generally phase shifted or reset with
respect to the pre-deletion rhythm (see Fig. 6A and B).
Such ‘resetting’ deletions have been observed during
ﬁctive locomotion (Lafreniere-Roula & McCrea, 2005). An
example is shown in Fig. 7A. In this example, the activity
of all ﬂexors (hip ﬂexor – Sart, and ankle ﬂexor –TA) was
prolonged for some time period during which the extensor
activity (hip extensor – SmAB, and ankle extensors – MG
and lateral gastrocnemius combined with soleus (LGS))
was suppressed. This behaviour was closely reproduced
in our model (see Fig. 7B) by applying a brief increase
in excitatory drive to the RG-F population (top trace in
Fig. 7B). In both the experimental and modelled cases
there is an obvious phase shift of the post-deletion rhythm.
In contrast to the effects of altering excitability at the
RG level, a temporary change in excitability of one of the
PF populations produces a deletion without phase shift
of the post-deletion rhythm. Figure 8A shows the effect
of increased drive to the PF-E population (see the top
trace). This increase results in sustained activity in the
PF-E population and inhibition of activity in the opposite
(PF-F) population. At the motoneurone level (two bottom
traces in Fig. 8A), there is a deletion of ﬂexor motoneurone
activity with sustained activity of extensor motoneurones.
Note, however, that there is a weak rhythmic modulation of

populations on the extensor side of the network (Ia-E, R-E and Mn-E)
showed sustained activity, whereas all populations on the ﬂexor side
(Ia-F, R-F and Mn-F) were inhibited. As a result, at the motoneurone
level (two bottom traces) there was a typical deletion of ﬂexor
motoneurone activity with a sustained activity of extensor
motoneurones. B, in this example, the deletion of ﬂexor activity was
produced by a temporary removal of excitatory drive to the RG-F
population (see the top trace). In both A and B, the vertical dotted
lines are plotted at intervals representing the step cycle period
preceding the deletion. These lines indicate where the onsets of
extensor bursts would have occurred if there had been no deletion.
Note that in both cases (A and B), when the applied ‘perturbation’
ends, the post-deletion rhythm re-appears with a phase shift in respect
to the pre-deletion rhythm (see arrows at the bottom of each panel).
In these simulations: drg-f = 0.46; drg-e = 0.5.

Figure 6. Simulations of ‘resetting’ deletions
A, an example of simulation of a resetting deletion. In this example,
the deletion of ﬂexor activity was produced by a temporary 400%
increase in excitatory drive to the RG-E population (see the top trace).
The increased drive changed RG-E population activity from phasic to
sustained. Consequently during this additional excitation, all

C(cid:2) 2006 The Authors. Journal compilation C(cid:2) 2006 The Physiological Society

628

I. A. Rybak and others

J Physiol 577.2

extensor motoneurone activity during the periods where
ﬂexor bursts ‘should’ have occurred as determined by
continued rhythmic activity at the RG level.

If instead of increasing excitation to one of the excitatory
PF populations the drive is reduced or eliminated, a
different type of deletion occurs. This is shown in Fig. 8B,
in which elimination of the excitatory drive to the PF-F
population produced a deletion of ﬂexor motoneurone
activity accompanied by continued rhythmic activity
of extensor motoneurones (see two bottom traces in
Fig. 8B). Without a strong tonic excitatory drive to PF-F,
the relatively weak phasic excitation from RG-F is not
sufﬁcient to overcome inhibition from Inrg-F. Therefore,
the PF-F population and hence the Mn-F population
remain inactive (a ﬂexor deletion). On the other hand, the
PF-E population receives both strong tonic (from MLR)
and weak phasic (from RG-E) excitatory inputs and strong
phasic inhibition (From Inrg-E). As a result, the activity
in PF-E and hence Mn-E population remains rhythmic
during the ﬂexor deletion.

feature of

An important

the simulated deletions
produced by alterations in PF network excitability (Fig. 8A
and B) that distinguishes them from those produced by
alterations in RG network excitability (Figs 6 and 7B) is
the lack of resetting of the post-deletion rhythm. Because
the locomotor rhythm is controlled by the RG, which is
unaffected by the applied perturbations, the re-appearance
of the rhythm after deletions occurs without shifting the
phase of post-deletion oscillations. Such ‘non-resetting’
deletions do occur during ﬁctive locomotion and are in
fact more frequent than the ‘resetting’ type of deletion
(see Lafreniere-Roula & McCrea, 2005).

Figure 7. Example of ‘resetting’ deletion
A, a brief deletion of extensor activity that occurred during
MLR-evoked ﬁctive locomotion (Lafreniere-Roula & McCrea, 2005).
The traces are rectiﬁed-integrated recordings from hip (sartorius, Sart)
and ankle (tibialis anterior, TA) ﬂexors, and hip (semimembranosus
combined with anterior biceps, SmAB) and ankle (medial
gastrocnemius (MG)) and lateral gastrocnemius combined with soleus,
LGS) extensors. The bottom traces show simultaneous intracellular
recordings from a Sart and a SmAB motoneurone. The vertical dotted
lines are plotted at the intervals representing the average period
calculated for the ﬁve step-cycle periods preceding the deletions.
These lines indicate approximately where the onsets of ﬂexor bursts
would have occurred had there been no deletion. They show that the
deletion is accompanied by an obvious phase shift of the post-deletion
rhythm with respect to the pre-deletion rhythm (see arrows at the
bottom). B, data from our simulation (similar to that in Fig. 6A) with
the parameters (MLR drives) adjusted to ﬁt phase durations in A
(drg-f = 0.48; drg-e = 0.5). In this simulation, a deletion of extensor
activity was produced by additional excitatory drive to the RG-F
population (see the top trace). The two bottom traces show changes in
the membrane potential of a single ﬂexor and extensor motoneurone,
respectively (action potentials truncated at −40 mV). As in the case of
experimental recordings (see A), the ‘perturbation’ applied to the RG
produced a resetting deletion accompanied by a shift in the phase of
the post-deletion rhythm (see arrows at the bottom).

Figure 9Aa and Ab shows examples of non-resetting
deletions of ﬂexor activity obtained during bouts of ﬁctive
locomotion. In Fig. 9Aa (data from Lafreniere-Roula &
McCrea, 2005), the failure of hip (Sart) and ankle (extensor
digitorum longus (EDL)) ﬂexor motoneurone activation
is accompanied by the continuous activity of extensors
operating at the hip (SmAB), knee (quadriceps (Quad))
and ankle (Plantaris (Plant)). Note that ﬂexor activity
re-appears at the moments expected had the deletion
not occured (see the fourth and sixth (from the left)
vertical dashed lines). Note also that during some of
the expected bursts there is a weak modulation of the
sustained extensor motoneurone activity (marked by
asterisk). Fig. 9Ab (M. Angel, P. Guertin, M.C. Perreault &
D. McCrea, unpublished observations) shows the results
of an experiment in which both ipsilateral and contra-
lateral ﬂexor and extensor activities were recorded. During
the bout of ﬁctive locomotion illustrated, there was no
activity in the contralateral ﬂexor and extensor nerves (see
coTA and coMG traces). This non-resetting deletion of
ipsilateral ﬂexor activity (omitting two bursts in the iTA
trace) was accompanied by a sustained ﬁring of ipsilateral
extensors (iAB and iLGS). This example shows that the

C(cid:2) 2006 The Authors. Journal compilation C(cid:2) 2006 The Physiological Society

J Physiol 577.2

Modelling spinal circuitry involved in locomotor pattern generation

629

maintenance of the phase of locomotor oscillations during
non-resetting deletions is not dependent upon continued
rhythm in the contralateral hindlimb. The activities shown
in Fig. 9Aa and 9Ab were simulated in a manner similar to
in the example shown in Fig. 8A by temporarily increasing
excitatory drive to the PF-E population (see Fig. 9Ba and
9Bb). In both examples, the locomotor period (deﬁned by
neural activity at the RG level) was unaffected even though
there was a failure to excite ﬂexor motoneurones. The
simulations show a rhythmic modulation of the sustained
activity of extensor motoneurones (Mn-E) during ﬂexor
deletions that is similar to that observed in the extensor
ENGs during ﬁctive locomotion (e.g. see traces for SmAB,
Quad, MG and Plant in Fig. 9Aa).

Figure 10A shows an example of a non-resetting deletion
of extensor activity during ﬁctive locomotion (from
Lafreniere-Roula & McCrea, 2005). In this example, an
unknown spontaneous perturbation caused the deletion
of activity of extensor motoneurones operating at hip
(SmAB) and ankle (gastrocnemius combined with soleus
(GS) and Plant) accompanied by a sustained activity of
ﬂexor motoneurones (TA and peroneus longus (PerL)).
The failure of ﬂexor motoneurones to hyperpolarize
during this period is illustrated in the intracellular record
from a TA motoneurone (Fig. 10A, bottom trace). The
re-appearance of extensor ENG activity (SmAB, GS and
Plant) occurred at the time expected had the deletion
not occurred. Note the hyperpolarization of the ﬂexor
(TA) motoneurone when extensor motoneurone activity
re-appears following the deletion. This behaviour was
simulated with our model by applying a temporary
increase in total excitatory drive to the PF-F population

produced sustained PF-E population activity that inhibited the PF-F
population. As a result, during the deletion there was sustained
activity in all populations on the extensor side of the network (Ia-E, R-E
and Mn-E), whereas all populations on the ﬂexor side (Ia-F, R-F and
Mn-F) were inhibited. At the motoneurone level (two bottom traces),
there was a typical deletion of ﬂexor motoneurone activity with a
sustained activity of extensor motoneurones. B, an example of
simulation of a non-resetting deletion with maintained rhythmic
activity in antagonists. A temporary removal of excitatory drive to the
PF-F population (see the top trace) stopped the activity of this
population. Rhythmic activity was maintained, however, in the PF-E
population because of the phasic inhibition provided by the RG-F
population via the Inrg-E population (see Fig. 2A). As a result, at the
motoneurone level (two bottom traces) there was a deletion of ﬂexor
motoneurone activity with maintained rhythmic activity of extensor
motoneurones. As in Fig. 6, the vertical dotted lines in both panels are
plotted at intervals representing the step cycle period preceding the
deletion. These lines show that in both cases (A and B), the rhythm
re-appeared after deletion without a phase shift with respect to the
pre-deletion rhythm (see arrows at the bottom of each panels). In both
simulations: drg-f = 0.48; drg-e = 0.5. Note that all changes (stepwise
increase and decrease) of the total drive were applied in the middle of
the ongoing phase to ensure that the timing of the post-deletion
rhythm was controlled by rhythmic input from the RG.

Figure 8. Simulation of ‘non-resetting’ deletions
A, an example of simulation of non-resetting deletion. The deletion of
ﬂexor activity was produced by a temporary 90% increase in excitatory
drive to the PF-E population (see the top trace). This additional drive

C(cid:2) 2006 The Authors. Journal compilation C(cid:2) 2006 The Physiological Society

630

I. A. Rybak and others

J Physiol 577.2

∗

Figure 9. ‘Non-resetting’ deletions of ﬂexor activity with a sustained activity of extensors
Aa, an example of deletion of ﬂexor activity occurring during MLR-evoked ﬁctive locomotion (Lafreniere-Roula
& McCrea, 2005). The traces are rectiﬁed–integrated recordings from hindlimb ﬂexors (hip – sartorius (Sart),
and ankle – extensor digitorum longus (EDL)) and extensors (hip – semimembranosus combined with anterior
biceps (SmAB), knee – quadriceps (Quad) and ankle – medial gastrocnemius (MG) and plantaris (Plant)). As in
Fig. 7, the distance between the vertical dotted lines is the average step cycle period prior to the deletions. These
lines indicate where the onsets of ﬂexor bursts would have occurred if there had been no deletion. They show
that the phase of the locomotor rhythm is maintained after the deletion. A weak modulation of the sustained
). Ab, another example of deletion of ﬂexor activity. An epoch of ﬁctive
extensor motoneurone activity is indicated (
locomotion is shown during which there was no contralateral (co) ﬂexor and extensor activity (see coTA and coMG
traces). The non-resetting deletion of ipsilateral ﬂexor activity (in which two bursts in the iTA trace were omitted)
was accompanied by a sustained ﬁring of ipsilateral (i) extensors (iAB and iLGS). As in the example shown in Aa,
the vertical dotted lines show that the phase of the locomotor rhythm is maintained after the deletion despite
the absence of contralateral locomotor activity. Ba, data from our simulation (as in Fig. 8A) with the parameters
(MLR drives) adjusted to ﬁt phase durations in Aa (drg-f = 0.44; drg-e = 0.55). In this simulation, a deletion of ﬂexor
activity was produced by increased excitatory drive to the PF-E population (see the top trace). As in the experimental
recordings in Aa, the phase of the locomotor rhythm is maintained after the deletion. The two bottom traces show
changes in the membrane potential of single ﬂexor and extensor motoneurones, respectively (action potentials
truncated at −40 mV). In the experimentally observed deletion shown in Aa, ﬁrst two ﬂexor bursts are missing
then one burst appears and then another is missing. To reproduce a similar pattern in the simulation, the drive
to PF-E was increased to near threshold for reproducing the deletion (providing an 88% increase in total drive).
Using a randomization process, the simulation was repeated until the data illustrated in Ba were obtained. Other
deletion trials showed deletions of all four sequential ﬂexor bursts or had ﬂexor activity in one of the other deleted
cycles. Note that during the deletion, the simulated ﬂexor motoneurone (Mn-F) is hyperpolarized. The extensor
motoneurone shows phasic modulation in its spiking without hyperpolarization, similar to that observed in ENGs
of extensors (SmAB, Quad and Plant) in Aa. Bb, data from our simulation (similar to data in Fig. 8A) with the MLR
drives adjusted to ﬁt phase durations in Ab (drg-f = 0.5; drg-e = 0.5). The deletion of ﬂexor activity was produced
by an additional temporary excitatory drive to the PF-E population (see the top trace). As in the experimental
recordings in Ab, the phase of the locomotor rhythm is maintained after the deletion.

C(cid:2) 2006 The Authors. Journal compilation C(cid:2) 2006 The Physiological Society

J Physiol 577.2

Modelling spinal circuitry involved in locomotor pattern generation

631

of deletions observed during ﬁctive locomotion in
the cat (Lafreniere-Roula & McCrea, 2005). In the
companion paper (Rybak et al. 2006) we also show
two-level CPG structure can provide an
that
explanation for
stimulation
to control rhythm generation without changing the
level of motoneurone activity (e.g. Kriellaars et al.

the ability of afferent

this

(see Fig. 10B). This resulted in a striking similarity to the
deletion occurring during ﬁctive locomotion including the
weak modulation of ﬂexor activity at the point of expected
extensor activity (marked by asterisks in Fig. 10A).

Our

simulations

that

demonstrate

individual
motoneurones whose activity is ‘deleted’ are hyper-
polarized during the deletion (see the second traces
from the bottom in Fig. 9Ba and Bb and the bottom
trace in Fig. 10B). In the model, this hyperpolarization is
provided by the continuous inhibition from the antagonist
Ia population. In contrast,
individual motoneurones
from the population active during the deletion show a
modulation of ﬁring but not a hyperpolarization (see
bottom traces in Fig. 9Ba and Bb and fourth trace in
Fig. 10B). These modelling results are consistent with the
intracellular recordings of motoneurone activity during
deletions (see Fig. 10A, bottom trace).

Figure 11A shows an example of a non-resetting deletion
of agonist motoneurones with continued rhythmic
activity of antagonists observed during ﬁctive locomotion
(from Lafreniere-Roula & McCrea, 2005). The failure
of excitation of extensor motoneurones operating at the
hip (SmAB) and ankle (MG and LGS) was accompanied
by bursting of ﬂexor motoneurones (hip ﬂexor – Sart,
and ankle ﬂexors – TA and PerL). After the deletion,
extensor activity re-appears without phase shift (i.e.
similar to that during other non-resetting deletions).
This behaviour could be simulated with our model
(as in the example shown in Fig. 8B) by a temporary
suppression of excitatory drive to the PF-E population (see
Fig. 11B). Under these conditions, the model reproduced
the deletion of activity of extensor motoneurones
accompanied by continued bursting activity of
the
ﬂexor motoneurone population. As in the experimental
recordings (Fig. 11A), locomotor periods (deﬁned by RG)
remained unaffected when ﬂexor motoneurone activity
dropped out (Fig. 11B).

Discussion

The major hypothesis explored in this study is that the
locomotor CPG has a two-level architecture consisting of a
half-centre RG and a PF network (Figs 1 and 2A). Although
some features of this architecture have been suggested
previously (e.g. Koshland & Smith, 1989; Kriellaars et al.
1994), we are unaware of any formal consideration of the
internal organization or modelling of network operation
using such an architecture. The proposed two-level CPG
architecture has several advantages. In particular, the
separation of RG and PF networks permits independent
control of rhythm generation at the RG level and patterns
of motoneurone activity at the PF level. The present
results show that the suggested CPG architecture can
readily account for the resetting and non-resetting types

C(cid:2) 2006 The Authors. Journal compilation C(cid:2) 2006 The Physiological Society

Figure 10. ‘Non-resetting’ deletion of extensor activity with a
sustained activity of ﬂexors
A, an example of a deletion of extensor activity during ﬁctive
locomotion. The recordings were made from ankle ﬂexors (tibialis
anterior, TA) and peroneus longus, PerL), and hip (semimembranosus
combined with anterior biceps, SmAB) and ankle (gastrocnemius
combined with soleus, GS, and plantaris, Plant) extensors
(Lafreniere-Roula & McCrea, 2005). The vertical dotted lines,
indicating where the onsets of extensor bursts would have occurred
had there been no deletion, show that the phase of the locomotor
rhythm is maintained after the deletion. The bottom trace is an
intracellular recording from TA motoneurone. B, data from our
simulation with the parameters (MLR drives) adjusted to ﬁt phase
durations in A (drg-f = 0.62; drg-e = 0.44). In this simulation, a
deletion of extensor activity was produced by a 100% increase in
excitatory drive to the PF-F population (see the top trace). As in the
experimental recordings in A, the phase of the locomotor rhythm is
maintained after deletion. The two bottom traces show changes in the
membrane potential of single ﬂexor and extensor motoneurones,
respectively (action potentials truncated at −40 mV). Note that during
the deletion the extensor motoneurone is hyperpolarized whereas the
ﬂexor motoneurone shows phasic modulation without an obvious
hyperpolarization similar to that in an intracellular recording from TA
motoneurone (see the bottom trace in A).

632

I. A. Rybak and others

J Physiol 577.2

1994) and to control motoneurone activity without
changing the rhythm (e.g. Guertin et al. 1995).

The half-centre concept and the two-level
CPG architecture

In accord with the original Graham Brown-Lundberg
half-centre model, our model employs ﬂexor and extensor
circuits that are organized symmetrically within the CPG.
An alternative view is that the periodic inactivation

Figure 11. Example of a non-resetting deletion with maintained
rhythmic activity of antagonist motoneurones
A, example of a deletion of extensor activity accompanied by
continued rhythmic activity of ﬂexor motoneurones (Lafreniere-Roula
& McCrea, 2005). The recordings were made from hip (sartorius, Sart)
and ankle (tibialis anterior, TA, and peroneus longus, PerL) ﬂexors, and
hip (semimembranosus combined with anterior biceps, SmAB) and
ankle (medial gastrocnemius, MG, and lateral gastrocnemius combined
with soleus, LGS) extensors. The bottom trace shows intracellular
recording from an extensor digitorum longus (EDL) motoneurone that
did not generate action potentials during ﬁctive locomotion. The
vertical dotted lines indicate where the termination of extensor bursts
would have occurred if there had been no deletion. They show that
the phase of the locomotor rhythm is maintained after deletion. B,
data from our simulation (similar to data in Fig. 8B) with the MLR
drives adjusted to ﬁt phase durations in A (drg-f = 0.46; drg-e = 0.48).
In this simulation, a deletion of ﬂexor activity was produced by a
temporary removal of excitatory drive to the PF-E population (see the
top trace). Two bottom traces show membrane potentials of single
ﬂexor and extensor motoneurones, respectively (action potentials
truncated at −45 mV). As in the experimental recordings in A, the
phase of the locomotor rhythm did not change after deletion.

of extensor bursts requires inhibition from a ﬂexor
half-centre whereas the inverse is not true (see Duysens
et al. 2006). Evidence against this view includes the
existence of spontaneous deletions of activity during ﬁctive
locomotion in both the ﬂexors (e.g. see Fig. 9Aa and Ab)
and extensors (e.g. Fig. 10A) that are both accompanied
by sustained activity of the antagonists (Lafreniere-Roula
& McCrea, 2005). Moreover, in the absence of proprio-
ceptive feedback during MLR-evoked ﬁctive locomotion,
there can be a dominance in duration of either the ﬂexor or
the extensor phase (Yakovenko et al. 2005). Thus we suggest
that although CPG can operate asymmetrically during
normal locomotion (as a consequence of afferent feed-
back), its organization appears to be symmetrical for the
generation of ﬂexor and extensor motoneurone activities
(see Duysens et al. 2006).

The idea that a mammalian CPG can contain separate
RG and PF circuits was suggested in studies of the
respiratory CPG (e.g. Rekling & Feldman, 1998; Feldman
& McCrimmon, 1998; Smith et al. 2000), but was not
commonly accepted and conﬁrmed experimentally (e.g.
see McCrimmon et al. 2000). The concept of the two-level
organization of the locomotor CPG proposed here has
been drawn explicitly from our experimental ﬁndings of
non-resetting deletions occurring spontaneously during
MLR-evoked ﬁctive locomotion (Lafreniere-Roula &
McCrea, 2005). Accordingly, we suggest
that phase
maintenance during non-resetting deletions occurs with
changes in excitability that affect the PF but not the
RG network. An alternative explanation is that activity
in the contralateral limb or in the forelimbs maintains
the phase during non-resetting deletions. While strong
interactions between the limbs can inﬂuence step cycle
timing in preparations with intact proprioceptive feed-
back, Fig. 9Ab illustrates that during ﬁctive locomotion in
immobilized cats, ipsilateral cycle timing during deletions
can be maintained even in the absence of contralateral
rhythmic activity. Of importance, cycle timing can also
be maintained throughout deletions during ﬁctive scratch
where rhythmic activity in the other limbs is expected to be
absent or very weak (Lafreniere-Roula & McCrea, 2005).
While the possibility that contralateral or forelimb CPGs
contribute to phase preservation during some deletions
cannot be excluded, the evidence suggests that the circuitry
controlling the ipsilateral hindlimb is itself able to maintain
the phase of locomotor oscillations during deletions.
We consider the frequent occurrence of non-resetting
deletions as strong support for the concept of the two-level
CPG proposed in this study.

As in the original Graham Brown-Lundberg half-centre
model, we suggest a bipartite organization of the RG. One
general difﬁculty with such an organization (discussed
by Grillner, 1981; Stein & Smith, 1997) is that the
classical one-level half-centre CPG cannot readily account
for complex activities of different motoneurone pools

C(cid:2) 2006 The Authors. Journal compilation C(cid:2) 2006 The Physiological Society

J Physiol 577.2

Modelling spinal circuitry involved in locomotor pattern generation

633

locomotion or during different
during ﬁctive or real
locomotor tasks (Engberg & Lundberg, 1969; Perret &
Cabelguen, 1980; Smith et al. 1998; Krouchev et al.
2006). One potential solution to this problem proposed
by Grillner (1981) is that the CPG consists of multiple
coupled oscillators or UBGs controlling motoneurones
operating at each joint (see Edgerton et al. 1976; Grillner
& Zangger, 1979; Stein, 1985; Stein & Smith, 1997). The
UBG concept can potentially resolve many difﬁculties of a
simple half-centre model (see Grillner, 1981). However,
the UBG schematic in which a single network within
each unit is responsible for both rhythm generation and
motoneurone excitation appears to be principally unable
to reproduce (or provide a reasonable explanation for)
the maintenance of the phase of locomotor oscillations
observed after non-resetting deletions or during afferent
stimulation (see Introduction and accompanying paper
Rybak et al. 2006). Further discussion of the UBG and
the present concept of CPG organization is presented
elsewhere (Lafreniere-Roula & McCrea, 2005).

the RG but

Another solution of the problem is to maintain a
incorporate a
bipartite organization of
more complicated intermediate PF network, operating
between the rhythm generator and motoneurones (Perret
& Cabelguen, 1980; Perret, 1983; Burke et al. 2001).
This idea led to the two-level architecture of
the
locomotor CPG proposed here (see Fig. 1). The proposed
two-level CPG includes a network of multiple PF
populations operating at PF level. We believe that suitable
interactions within the PF network and between the RG
and PF networks can provide the generation and shaping
of more complicated motoneurone activity including that
of bifunctional motoneurones (see Chakrabarty et al.
2004), and overcome most of the limitations of the simple
half-centre organization. In our opinion, a principal
advantage of the UBG, namely the control of activity of
subsets of motoneurones during locomotion, could also
be accomplished within an organization composed of
multiple PF networks of varying complexity.

It is important to notice that our model proposes three
levels of reciprocity in the spinal circuitry: inhibitory
interactions operating at the RG and PF levels and
inhibition between antagonist motoneurones produced
by populations of interneurones outside of the CPG per
se and represented in the model by Ia interneurones.
Recent evidence suggests that the rhythmic inhibition of
motoneurones during locomotion involves interneurone
populations in addition to the Ia interneurones depicted
in the present model (Gosgnach et al. 2006). Regardless
of their identity, additional control of motoneurone
excitability by inhibitory interneurones involved in RG
or PF networks would allow for the dissociation of
rhythmic excitation and inhibition of motoneurones
observed in some neonatal preparations (Hochman &
Schmidt, 1998). In agreement with previous suggestions

C(cid:2) 2006 The Authors. Journal compilation C(cid:2) 2006 The Physiological Society

(Pratt & Jordan, 1987; Orlovsky et al. 1999), the ‘local’
reciprocal interactions via Ia interneurones provide an
additional ﬂexibility that could be manipulated (e.g. by
afferent feedback) to shape the ﬁring patterns of individual
motoneurone pools. However, the reduced version of
the model considered here, which contains only two PF
populations and two motoneurone populations, cannot
of course reproduce the full repertoire of motoneurone
patterns recorded during ﬁctive or real locomotion. This
issue will be considered in future investigations using more
complete computational models.

Modelling motoneurones, interneurones
and the rhythm generating circuit

The intrinsic biophysical properties of different inter-
neurone types in the mammalian spinal cord (such as
the types of ionic channels and their voltage gating and
temporal characteristics) have not been well characterized.
This is especially true for the interneurones involved
in CPG operation. Our models of interneurones do
not represent realistic models of any particular spinal
interneurones, but rather are generic models of the
Hodgkin-Huxley type. At the same time, we believe that
using such models gave us an opportunity to account for
some non-linear properties of real neurones provided by
the Hodgkin–Huxley formal descriptions.

more

detailed

Although

multicompartment
computational models of cat motoneurones are available
(e.g. Dai et al. 2002), we used a two-compartment model
(Booth et al. 1997) for computational efﬁciency. This
model is able to reproduce the normal action potential
ﬁring behaviour observed in spinal motoneurones
as well as a range of complex ﬁring patterns, such
as Ca2+
-dependent regenerative spiking and plateau
potentials (Booth et al. 1997). Based on existing evidence
(e.g. Lee & Heckman, 2001), we also incorporated
persistent sodium channels in our model. A number of
changes in motoneurone conductances during the trans-
ition from rest to ﬁctive locomotion have been recently
described in decerebrate cats. These include activation of
voltage-dependent excitatory conductances, a reduction
in the spike afterhyperpolarization and a lowering of
voltage threshold for spike initiation (see Krawitz et al.
2001; Dai et al. 2002). We have not incorporated these
changes in the present model. Instead, parameters were
chosen to reproduce realistic ﬁring rates and recruitment
during locomotion in the simpliﬁed motoneurone models
used. The present motoneurone model does, however,
demonstrate realistic changes in the membrane potential
and average ﬁring frequency of single motoneurones and
a range of individual motoneurone frequencies within the
motoneurone populations (e.g. see Fig. 5).

Because the intrinsic neuronal mechanisms deﬁning
rhythmogenic properties of neurones comprising the

634

I. A. Rybak and others

J Physiol 577.2

locomotor CPG are unknown, we chose to use a
mechanism based on the persistent (slowly inactivating)
I NaP that has been shown to contribute to rhythmogenesis
in other systems including respiratory rhythm generation
(Butera et al. 1999a,b). The existing data, however, are
certainly not sufﬁcient to claim that the I NaP-dependent
mechanism employed in our model operates in the real
locomotor CPG in the spinal cord. Other mechanisms
based on different cellular properties, including those
found in other preparations (see El Manira et al. 1994;
B¨uschges et al. 2000; Grillner et al. 2001; Butt et al. 2002;
Grillner & Wall´en, 2002; Grillner, 2003), may be essential
to the generation of locomotor rhythm in adult mammals.
We suggest that the hypothesized two-level architecture
of the locomotor CPG proposed in our model has
merit regardless of the particular cellular rhythmogenic
mechanism employed in the model. An intrinsic excitatory
rhythmogenic mechanism such as I NaP is, however, critical
to the generation of pharmacologically evoked rhythms
(Fig. 3B) and the synchronized rhythmic activity of ﬂexors
and extensors when inhibition is blocked (Fig. 3C). Thus
the generation of locomotor rhythm in our model is based
on RG half-centres containing populations of neurons
with intrinsic rhythmogenic properties allowing each
half-centre, under certain conditions, to generate rhythmic
activity on its own.

At the same time, the locomotor rhythm and pattern
generated in our model is strongly dependent on the
reciprocal inhibition between the RG half-centres (e.g. see
Fig. 4Ab). Moreover, this inhibition plays a crucial role
in the coupling of locomotor phases, phase switching,
and hence in the regulation of the duration of locomotor
phases and step cycle. A combination of the intrinsic
I NaP-dependent properties of RG neurones with the
reciprocal inhibition between the RG half-centres allowed
our model to simulate MLR-evoked locomotor oscillations
with a realistic range of step cycle durations and ratio of one
phase duration to the period (Fig. 4Ba and Bb). Therefore,
we believe that regardless of the intrinsic rhythmogenic
mechanisms operating in spinal neurons comprising the
CPG, the reciprocal inhibitory interactions between the
RG half-centres are extremely important for locomotor
rhythm generation. Moreover, we think that reciprocal
inhibitory interactions between functionally antagonistic
neural populations at all levels, from the level of rhythm
generator to the level of local, Ia-mediated interactions
between direct antagonists, are essential for coordination
and shaping the locomotor pattern.

Deletions

The CPG model described here evolved primarily
from observations of deletions in motoneurone activity
occurring spontaneously during MLR-evoked ﬁctive
locomotion in adult decerebrate cats (Lafreniere-Roula &

McCrea, 2005). The major ﬁndings of that experimental
study were that: (1) deletions of ﬂexor or extensor activities
are accompanied by either sustained (see examples in
Figs 9Aa and 9Ab and 10A) or rhythmic (Fig. 11A) activity
in antagonists; (2) deletions occur simultaneously in distal
and proximal motoneurone pools; and (3) the majority
of deletions are characterized by a maintenance of the
phase of the post-deletion rhythm (Figs 9Aa and 9Ab,
10A and 11A). The two-level CPG architecture (with RG
and PF levels, see Figs 1 and 2A) permits CPG operation
with an unperturbed performance of the RG circuit when
the motoneurone activations are altered by disturbances
at the PF level. The incorporation of a PF network
with reciprocal inhibition between the PF populations
providing excitation to multiple groups of synergistic
motoneurone pools, allows the model to reproduce and
explain almost all of the experimental ﬁndings concerning
deletions (Lafreniere-Roula & McCrea, 2005).

It is commonly accepted that reciprocal inhibition is
necessary for the coordination of ﬂexor and extensor
motoneurone activities. This concept has been expressed
as a ‘reciprocity module’
in which the excitation of
antagonists is strictly coupled to inhibition of antagonists
by speciﬁc interactions among Ia interneurones, Renshaw
cells and motoneurones (Jordan, 1991). Studies of
deletions provide additional experimental support for
such an organization by showing that the reciprocal
hyperpolarization of antagonist motoneurones observed
during normal ﬁctive behaviours is usually maintained
during deletions (see Jordan, 1991; Lafreniere-Roula
& McCrea, 2005). The present model incorporating a
single reciprocity module shows that deletions of agonist
activity are accompanied by a reduced hyperpolarization of
antagonist motoneurones (see Figs 9Ba and Bb, and 10B).
Our modelling results give rise to the following hypo-
theses: (1) resetting deletions observed during ﬁctive
locomotion, that are associated with a phase shift in
the post-deletion rhythm (as in Fig. 7A), result from
spontaneous perturbations that change the excitability
of one of the RG half-centres (see Figs 6A and 7B); (2)
non-resetting deletions, characterized by the maintenance
of
the post-deletion rhythm (similar
to those shown in Figs 9Aa and Ab, 10A and 11A),
result from perturbations that do not affect the RG
but instead change the excitability of one of the PF
populations (see Figs 8A and B, 9Ba and Bb, 10B and
11B); (3) non-resetting deletions of motoneurone activity
accompanied by a sustained activity of antagonists (e.g.
shown in Figs 9Aa and Ab, and 10A) are produced
by spontaneous perturbations increasing the excitability
of the PF population projecting to the motoneurones
with sustained activity during deletion (see Figs 8A,
9Ba and Bb, and 10B).
In contrast, non-resetting
deletions accompanied by continued rhythmic activity of
antagonists (as in Fig. 11A) result from a spontaneous

the phase of

C(cid:2) 2006 The Authors. Journal compilation C(cid:2) 2006 The Physiological Society

J Physiol 577.2

Modelling spinal circuitry involved in locomotor pattern generation

635

Table 1. Steady-state activation and inactivation variables and time constants for voltage-dependent ionic
channels

Ionic
channels

+

Na

+

NaP

+
K

2+

CaN

2+

CaL

m∞(V), V is in mV
h∞(V), V is in mV

−1

−1

m∞Na = (1 + exp (−(V + 35)/7.8))
h∞Na = (1 + exp((V + 55)/7))
−1
m∞NaP = (1 + exp(−(V + 47.1)/3.1))
h∞NaP = (1 + exp((V + 59)/8))
−1
m∞K = (1 + exp(−(V + 28)/15))
−1
m∞CaN = (1 + exp(−(V + 30)/5))
−1
h∞CaN = (1 + exp((V + 45)/5))
−1
m∞CaL = (1 + exp(−(V + 40)/7))

hK = 1

−1

hCaL = 1

τ m(V), ms
τ h(V), ms
τ mNa = 0
τ mNaP = 0

τ hNa = 30/(exp((V + 50)/15) + exp(−(V + 50)/16))
τ hNaP = τ hNaPmax/cosh(V + 59)/16), τ hNaPmax = 1200
τ mK = 7/(exp((V + 40)/40) + exp((—V + 40)/50))

τ mCaN = 4
τ hCaN = 40
τ mCaL = 40

+

channel, are taken from Booth et al. (1997). The

All expressions and parameters, except those for the NaP
expressions for the NaP

channel are from Rybak et al. (2003).

+

decrease in excitability of the PF populations projecting to
the motoneurones whose activity is ‘deleted’ (see Figs 8B
and 11B).

than to affect

Our analysis shows that in order for the model to
operate properly, the mutual inhibition between the RG
populations should be stronger than that between the PF
populations. Accordingly, a much stronger perturbation
is required to produce a resetting deletion at the RG
level
the PF circuit and produce a
non-resetting deletion (see ﬁgure legends for Fig. 6A and
Fig. 8A and compare the top traces in these ﬁgures).
This might explain why non-resetting deletions occur
more frequently during ﬁctive locomotion than resetting
deletions (Lafreniere-Roula & McCrea, 2005). Another
feature of the model is that a deletion that silences activity
in the longer duration locomotor phase requires a much
greater increase in the excitability of the antagonistic PF
population than a deletion affecting the shorter duration
locomotor phase. This is consistent with the observation
that most deletions during ﬁctive locomotion occur in
motoneurones active in the shorter duration locomotor
phase (whether this shorter phase is ﬂexion or extension).

Some modelling predictions

In this paper we have presented a simpliﬁed model of
the spinal cord circuitry organization that reproduces
and offers explanations for spontaneous deletions of
motoneurone activity occurring with and without a
resetting of
the locomotor pattern. One immediate
application of the present model is the formulation of
criteria for the functional identiﬁcation of new classes of
spinal interneurones involved in the locomotor pattern
generation. Based on our model, we suggest that the
neurones comprising the RG may be identiﬁed in ﬁctive

C(cid:2) 2006 The Authors. Journal compilation C(cid:2) 2006 The Physiological Society

locomotion preparations using the following criteria.
These neurones should (1) receive excitation from the
MLR region, (2) demonstrate rhythmic activity during
ﬁctive locomotion that persists during non-resetting
deletions and (3) not be monosynaptically coupled to
motoneurones. In contrast, the neurones comprising the
PF network should (1) demonstrate rhythmic activity
during ﬁctive locomotion that
fails during deletion
episodes and (2) produce monosynaptic EPSPs in synergist
motoneurones.

Appendix

General model parameters

∗

ENa = 55 mV;
C = 1 μF cm

EK = −80 mV;
−2.

ECa = 80 mV;

Parameters of synapses
ESynE = −10 mV;
¯gE = 0.05 mS cm
−2;
¯gEd = 0.05 mS cm
−2;
τSynE = 5 ms;

ESynI = −70 mV;
¯gI = 0.05 mS cm
¯gId = 0.05 mS cm
τSynI = 5 ms.

−2;
−2;

Neurone parameters

RG neurones:

¯gNa = 30 mS cm
−2;
¯gK = 1 mS cm
−2;
EL = −64.0 ± 0.64 mV.

¯gNaP = 0.25 mS cm
gL = 0.1 mS cm
−2;

−2;

636

I. A. Rybak and others

J Physiol 577.2

Table 2 . Weights of synaptic connections in the network

Target population

RG-E
RG-F
Inrg-E
Inrg-F
PF-E
PF-F
Inpf-E
Inpf-F
Ia-E
Ia-F
R-E
R-F
Mn-E
Mn-F

Source population or drive (weight of synaptic input to one neurone)
MLR (1); RG-E (0.0125); RG-F (0.0125); Inrg-E (−0.115)
MLR (1); RG-E (0.0125); RG-F (0.0125); Inrg-F (−0.115)
RG-F (0.45)
RG-E (0.45)
MLR (1); RG-E (0.0075); Inrg-E (−0.05); Inpf-E (−0.35)
MLR (1); RG-F (0.0075); Inrg-F (−0.05); Inpf-F (−0.35)
PF-F (0.2)
PF-E (0.2)
PF-E (0.4); Ia-F (−0.1); R-E (−0.1)
PF-F (0.4); Ia-F (−0.1); R-F (−0.1)
Mn-E (0.25); R-F (−0.1)
Mn-F (0.25); R-E (−0.1)
PF-E (0.5); Ia-F (−0.6); R-E (−0.2)
PF-F (0.5); Ia-E (−0.6); R-F (−0.2)

Values in brackets represent relative weights of synaptic inputs from the corresponding source
populations (wji) or drives (wdmi), see Eqn. (10). MLR drives to PF-E and PF-F (dpf-e = dpf-f) = 0.5
for MLR drives to RG-E and RG-F (drg-e and drg-f ) see ﬁgure legends.

PF neurones:

¯gNa = 30 mS cm
−2;
¯gK = 1.2 mS cm
−2;
EL = −64.0 ± 0.64 mV.

¯gNaP = 0.1 mS cm
−2;
gL = 0.1 mS cm
−2;

∗
Motoneurones

:

¯gNa(S) = 120 mS cm
−2;
¯gCaN(S) = 14 mS cm
−2;
gL(S) = 0.51 mS cm
−2;
¯gCaN(D) = 0.3 mS cm
−2;
¯gK,Ca(D) = 1.1 mS cm
−2;
gL(D) = 0.51 mS cm
−2;
gC = 0.1 mS cm
−2;
α = 0.0009 mol C
Kd = 0.2 μM.

¯gK(S) = 100 mS cm
−2;
¯gK,Ca(S) = 5 mS cm
−2
EL(S) = −65.0 ± 6.5 mV;
¯gCaL(D) = 0.33 mS cm
−2;
¯gNaP(D) = 0.10 mS cm
−2;
EL(D) = −65.0 ± 3.25 mV;
p = 0.1;
−1;

f = 0.01;
kCa = 2 ms
−1;

−1 μm

∗
Other interneurones

:
¯gNa = 120 mS cm
−2;
gL = 0.51 mS cm
−2;

¯gK = 100 mS cm

−2;

EL =
−64.0 ± 3.2 mV (for all interneurones except Inrg)

and
EL = 57.5 ± 2.875 mV(for Inrg).

∗

(except for E L) are taken
The parameters indicated by
from Booth et al. (1997). To provide heterogeneity of
neurones within neural populations, the value of EL was
randomly assigned from normal distributions (see mean
values ± s.d.).

References

Beato M & Nistri A (1999). Interaction between disinhibited

Booth V, Rinzel J & Kiehn O (1997). Compartmental model of

bursting and ﬁctive locomotor patterns in the rat
isolated spinal cord. J Neurophysiol 82,
2029–2038.
vertebrate motoneurons for Ca2+
plateau potentials under pharmacological treatment.
J Neurophysiol 78, 3371–3385.

-dependent spiking and

Bracci E, Ballerini L & Nistri A (1996). Localization of

rhythmogenic networks responsible for spontaneous bursts
induced by strychnine and bicuculline in the rat isolated
spinal cord. J Neurosci 16, 7063–7076.

Brownstone RM, Jordan LM, Kriellaars DJ, Noga BR &

Shefchyk SJ (1992). On the regulation of repetitive ﬁring in
lumbar motoneurones during ﬁctive locomotion in the cat.
Exp Brain Res 90, 441–455.

Burke RE, Degtyarenko AM & Simon ES (2001). Patterns of

locomotor drive to motoneurons and last-order
interneurons: clues to the structure of the CPG.
J Neurophysiol 86, 447–462.

B¨uschges A, Wikstrom MA, Grillner S & El Manira A (2000).

Roles of high-voltage activated calcium channel subtypes in a
vertebrate spinal locomotor network. J Neurophysiol 84,
2758–2766.

Butera RJ, Rinzel JR & Smith JC (1999a). Models of respiratory
rhythm generation in the pre-B¨otzinger complex. I. Bursting
pacemaker neurons. J Neurophysiol 82, 382–397.

C(cid:2) 2006 The Authors. Journal compilation C(cid:2) 2006 The Physiological Society

J Physiol 577.2

Modelling spinal circuitry involved in locomotor pattern generation

637

Butera RJ, Rinzel JR & Smith JC (1999b). Models of respiratory

rhythm generation in the pre-B¨otzinger complex. II.
Populations of coupled pacemaker neurons. J Neurophysiol
82, 398–415.

Butt SJB, Harris-Warrick RM & Kiehn O (2002). Firing

properties of identiﬁed interneuron populations in the
mammalian hindlimb central pattern generator. J Neurosci
22, 9961–9971.

Chakrabarty S, Rybak IA & McCrea DA (2004). Modelling the

variety of activation patterns of bifunctional hindlimb
motoneurons during ﬁctive locomotion. Abstr Soc Neurosci
883.2.

Gosgnach S, Lanuza GM, Butt SJ, Saueressig H, Zhang Y,
Velasquez T, Riethmacher D, Callaway EM, Kiehn O &
Goulding M (2006). V1 spinal neurons regulate the speed of
vertebrate locomotor outputs. Nature 440, 215–219.

Graham Brown T (1911). The intrinsic factors in the act of

progression in the mammal. Proc R Soc Lond B Biol Sci 84,
308–319.

Graham Brown T (1914). On the fundamental activity of the

nervous centres: together with an analysis of the
conditioning of rhythmic activity in progression, and a
theory of the evolution of function in the nervous system.
J Physiol 48, 18–41.

Cowley KC & Schmidt BJ (1995). Effects of inhibitory amino

Grillner S (1981). Control of locomotion in bipeds, tetrapods,

acid antagonists on reciprocal inhibitory interactions during
rhythmic motor activity in the in vitro neonatal rat spinal
cord. J Neurophysiol 74, 1109–1117.

Dai Y, Jones KE, Fedirchuk B, McCrea DA & Jordan LM (2002).
A modelling study of locomotion-induced hyperpolarization
of voltage threshold in cat lumbar motoneurones. J Physiol
544, 521–536.

Darbon P, Yvon C, Legrand JC & Streit J (2004). INaP underlies

intrinsic spiking and rhythm generation in networks of
cultured rat spinal cord neurons. Eur J Neurosci 20,
976–988.

Del Negro CA, Koshiya N, Butera RJ & Smith JC (2002).
Persistent sodium current, membrane properties and
bursting behavior of pre-B¨otzinger complex inspiratory
neurons in vitro. J Neurophysiol 88, 2242–2250.

Duysens J (1977). Reﬂex control locomotion as revealed by

stimulation of cutaneous afferents in spontaneously walking
premammillary cats. J Neurophysiol 40, 737–751.

Duysens J, McCrea D & Lafreniere-Roula M (2006). How
deletions in a model could help explain deletions in the
laboratory. J Neurophysiol 95, 562–565.

Edgerton VR, Grillner S, Sjostrom A & Zangger P (1976).

Central generation of locomotion in vertebrates. In Neural
Control of Locomotion, ed. Herman RM, Grillner S, Stein
PSG & Stuart DG, pp. 439–464. Plenum Press, New York.

El Manira A, Tegner J & Grillner S (1994). Calcium-dependent
potassium channels play a critical role for burst termination
in the locomotor network in lamprey. J Neurophysiol 72,
1852–1861.

Engberg I & Lundberg A (1969). An electromyographic analysis

of muscular activity in the hindlimb of the cat during
unrestrained locomotion. Acta Physiol Scand 75, 614–630.

Fedirchuk B & Dai Y (2004). Monoamines increase the
excitability of spinal neurones in the neonatal rat by
hyperpolarizing the threshold for action potential
production. J Physiol 557, 355–361.

Feldman AG & Orlovsky GN (1975). Activity of interneurons

mediating reciprocal 1a inhibition during locomotion. Brain
Res 84, 181–194.

Feldman JL & McCrimmon DR (1998). Neural control of
breathing. In Fundamental Neuroscience, ed. Bloom FE,
Landis SC, Roberts JL, Squire LC & Zigmond MJ, chap. 40,
pp. 1063–1090. Academic Press, New York.

Forssberg H, Grillner S, Halbertsma J & Rossignol S (1980).

The locomotion of the low spinal cat. II. Interlimb
coordination. Acta Physiol Scand 108, 289–295.

C(cid:2) 2006 The Authors. Journal compilation C(cid:2) 2006 The Physiological Society

and ﬁsh. In Handbook of Physiology. The Nervous System.
Motor Control sect.1, vol II, ed. Brookhart JM &
Mountcastle VB, pp. 1179–1236. American Physiological
Society, Bethesda.

Grillner S (2003). The motor infrastructure: from ion channels

to neuronal networks. Nat Rev Neurosci 4, 573–586.

Grillner S & Wall´en P (2002). Cellular bases of a vertebrate

locomotor system-steering, intersegmental and segmental
co-ordination and sensory control. Brain Res Rev 40, 92–106.
Grillner S, Wall´en P, Hill R, Cangiano L & El Manira A (2001).

Ion channels of importance for the locomotor pattern
generation in the lamprey brainstem-spinal cord. J Physiol
533, 23–30.

Grillner S & Zangger P (1979). On the central generation of

locomotion in the low spinal cat. Exp Brain Res 34,
241–261.

Guertin P, Angel MJ, Perreault M-C & McCrea DA (1995).

Ankle extensor group I afferents excite extensors throughout
the hindlimb during ﬁctive locomotion in the cat. J Physiol
487, 197–209.

Hochman S & Schmidt BJ (1998). Whole cell recordings of

lumbar motoneurons during locomotor-like activity in the
in vitro neonatal rat spinal cord. J Neurophysiol 79,
743–752.

Jankowska E (1992). Interneuronal relay in spinal pathways

from proprioceptors. Prog Neurobiol 38, 335–378.

Jankowska E, Jukes MGM, Lund S & Lundberg A (1967a). The

effect of DOPA on the spinal cord. V. Reciprocal
organization of pathways transmitting excitatory action to
alpha motoneurones of ﬂexors and extensors. Acta Physiol
Scand 70, 369–388.

Jankowska E, Jukes MGM, Lund S & Lundberg A (1967b). The

effect of DOPA on the spinal cord. VI. Half-centre
organization of interneurones transmitting effects from the
ﬂexor reﬂex afferents. Acta Physiol Scand 70, 389–402.

Jordan LM (1991). Brainstem and spinal cord mechanisms for

the initiation of locomotion. In Neurobiological Basis of
Human Locomotion, ed. Shimamura M, Grillner S &
Edgerton VR, pp. 3–20. Japan Scientiﬁc Societies Press,
Tokyo.

Kjaerulff O & Kiehn O (2001). 5-HT modulation of multiple
inward rectiﬁers in motoneurons in intact preparations of
the neonatal rat spinal cord. J Neurophysiol 85, 580–593.

Koshland G & Smith JL (1989). Mutable and immutable

features of paw-shake responses after hindlimb
deafferentation in the cat. J Neurophysiol 62, 162–173.

638

I. A. Rybak and others

J Physiol 577.2

Krawitz S, Fedirchuk B, Dai Y, Jordan LM & McCrea DA
(2001). State-dependent hyperpolarization of voltage
threshold enhances motoneurone excitability during ﬁctive
locomotion in the cat. J Physiol 532, 271–281.

Kriellaars DJ, Brownstone RM, Noga BR & Jordan LM (1994).

Mechanical entrainment of ﬁctive locomotion in the
decerebrate cat. J Neurophysiol 71, 2074–2086.

Pratt CA & Jordan LM (1987). Ia inhibitory interneurons and
Renshaw cells as contributors to the spinal mechanisms of
ﬁctive locomotion. J Neurophysiol 57, 56–71.

Rekling JC & Feldman JL (1998). PreB¨otzinger complex and

pacemaker neurons: hypothesized site and kernel for
respiratory rhythm generation. Annu Rev Physiol 60,
385–405.

Krouchev N, Kalaska JF & Drew T (2006). Sequential activation

Rossignol S (1996). Neural control of stereotypic limb

of muscle synergies during locomotion in the intact cat as
revealed by cluster analysis and direct decomposition.
J Neurophysiol 96, 1991–2010.

Lafreniere-Roula M & McCrea DA (2005). Deletions of

rhythmic motoneuron activity during ﬁctive locomotion and
scratch provide clues to the organization of the mammalian
central pattern generator. J Neurophysiol 94, 1120–1132.

Lee RH & Heckman CJ (2001). Essential role of a fast persistent

inward current in action potential initiation and control of
rhythmic ﬁring. J Neurophysiol 85, 472–475.

Lundberg A (1981). Half-centres revisited. In Regulatory

Functions of the CNS. Motion and Organization Principles, ed.
Szentagothai J, Palkovits M & Hamori J, pp. 155–167.
Pergamon Akadem Kiado, Budapest.

movements. In Handbook of Physiology, Sect. 12 Exercise:
Regulation and Integration of Multiple Systems, ed. Rowell
LB & Shepherd J, chap. 12, pp. 173–216. American
Physiological Society, Bethesda.

Rybak IA, Lafreniere-Roula M, Shevtsova NA & McCrea DA
(2004a). A. two layer model of the spinal locomotor CPG:
insights from deletions of activity during ﬁctive locomotion.
Abstr Soc Neurosci 883.3.

Rybak IA & McCrea DA (2005). Computational modeling of
the mammalian locomotor CPG. Abstr Soc Neurosci, 630.1.
Rybak IA, Paton JFR & Schwaber JS (1997). Modeling neural
mechanisms for genesis of respiratory rhythm and pattern.
II. Network models of the central respiratory pattern
generator. J Neurophysiol 77, 2007–2026.

McCrea DA (2001). Spinal circuitry of sensorimotor control of

Rybak IA, Shevtsova NA, Paton JF, Dick TE, St -John WM,

locomotion. J Physiol 533, 41–50.

McCrea DA, Pratt CA & Jordan LM (1980). Renshaw cell

activity and recurrent effects on motoneurons during ﬁctive
locomotion. J Neurophysiol 44, 475–488.

McCrimmon DR, Monnier A, Hayashi F & Zuperku EJ (2000).

Pattern formation and rhythm generation in the ventral
respiratory group. Clin Exp Pharmacol Physiol 27,
126–131.

MacGregor RI (1987). Neural and Brain Modelling. Academic

Press, New York.

Miller S & Scott PD (1977). The spinal locomotor generator.

Exp Brain Res 30, 387–403.

Noga BR, Cowley KC, Huang A, Jordan LM & Schmidt BJ
(1993). Effects of inhibitory amino acid antagonists on
locomotor rhythm in the decerebrate cat. Abstr Soc Neurosci
19, 540.

Noga BR, Shefchyk SJ & Jordan LM (1987). The role of

Renshaw cells in locomotion: antagonism of their excitation
from motor axon collaterals with intravenous
mecamylamine. Exp Brain Res 66, 99–105.

Orlovsky GN, Deliagina T & Grillner S (1999). Neuronal

Control of Locomotion: from Mollusc to Man. Oxford
University Press, New York.

Perreault MC, Angel MJ, Guertin P & McCrea DA (1995).

Effects of stimulation of hindlimb ﬂexor group II afferents
during ﬁctive locomotion in the cat. J Physiol 487, 211–220.

Perret C (1983). Centrally generated pattern of motoneuron

activity during locomotion in the cat. Symp Soc Exp Biol 37,
405–422.

Perret C & Cabelguen JM (1980). Main characteristics of the

hindlimb locomotor cycle in the decorticate cat with special
reference to bifunctional muscles. Brain Res 187, 333–352.

Perrier JF, Alaburda A & Hounsgaard J (2003). 5-HT1A

receptors increase excitability of spinal motoneurons by
current in the adult turtle.
inhibiting a TASK-1-like K
J Physiol 548, 485–492.

+

M¨orschel M & Dutschmann M (2004b). Modeling the
ponto-medullary respiratory network. Respir Physiol
Neurobiol 143, 307–319.

Rybak IA, Shevtsova NA, St-John WM, Paton JFR & Pierreﬁche

O (2003). Endogenous rhythm generation in the
pre-B¨otzinger complex and ionic currents: modelling and in
vitro studies. Eur J Neurosci 18, 239–257.

Rybak IA, Stecina K, Shevtsova NA & McCrea DA (2006).

Modelling spinal circuitry involved in locomotor pattern
generation: insights from the effects of afferent stimulation.
J Physiol 577, 641–658.

Shefchyk S & Jordan LM (1985). Excitatory and inhibitory

post-synaptic potentials in alpha-motoneurons produced
during ﬁctive locomotion by stimulation of the
mesencephalic locomotor region. J Neurophysiol 53,
1345–1355.

Sirota MG & Shik ML (1973). The cat locomotion elicited

through the electrode implanted in the mid-brain. [Article in
Russian]. Fizol Zh SSSR Im I M Sechenova 59, 1314–1321.
Smith JC, Butera RJ, Koshiya N, Del Negro C, Wilson CG &

Johnson SM (2000). Respiratory rhythm generation in
neonatal and adult mammals: the hybrid pacemaker-
network model. Respir Physiol 122, 131–147.

Smith JL, Carlson-Kuhta P & Trank TV (1998). Forms of
forward quadrupedal locomotion. III. A comparison of
posture, hindlimb kinematics, and motor patterns for
downslope and level walking. J Neurophysiol 79, 1702–1716.

Stecina K, Quevedo J & McCrea DA (2005). Parallel reﬂex

pathways from ﬂexor muscle afferents evoking resetting and
ﬂexion enhancement during ﬁctive locomotion and scratch
in the cat. J Physiol 569, 275–290.

Stein PSG (1985). Neural control of vertebrate limb:

multipartite pattern generators in the spinal cord. In
Comparative Neurobiology. Modes of Communication in the
Nervous System, ed. Cohen MJ & Strumwasser F,
pp. 245–253. John Wiley and Sons, New York.

C(cid:2) 2006 The Authors. Journal compilation C(cid:2) 2006 The Physiological Society

J Physiol 577.2

Modelling spinal circuitry involved in locomotor pattern generation

639

Stein PSG (2005). Neuronal control of turtle hindlimb motor

rhythms. J Comp Physiol A 191, 213–229.

Stein PSG & Grossman ML (1980). Central program for

Yakovenko S, McCrea DA, Stecina K & Prochazka A (2005).
Control of locomotor cycle durations. J Neurophysiol 94,
1057–1065.

scratch reﬂex in turtle. J Comp Physiol A 140,
287–294.

Stein PSG & Smith JL (1997). Neural and biomechanical

control strategies for different forms of vertebrate hindlimb
motor tasks. In Neurons, Networks, and Motor Behavior,
ed. Stain PSG, Grillner S, Selverston AI & Stuart DG, pp.
61–73. MIT Press, Cambridge, MA.

Streit J, Tscherter A & Darbon P (2005). Rhythm generation in

spinal culture. Is it the neuron or the network? Advances in
Network Electrophysiology Using Multi-Electrode Arrays, ed.
Taketani M & Baudry M Springer, New York.

Whelan PJ (2003). Developmental aspects of spinal locomotor
function: insights from using the in vitro mouse spinal cord
preparation. J Physiol 553, 695–706.

Acknowledgements

This study was supported by the Bioengineering Research
Partnership grant from the National Institutes of Health (NIH)
R01NS048844. I.A.R. and N.A.S. were initially supported by
the NIH grants R01NS046062 and R01HL072415. D.A.M.
and M.L-R. were also supported by grants from the NIH
(R01NS040846) and the Canadian Institutes of Health Research
(to D.A.M.) and the Manitoba Health Research Council
(studentship to M.L-R.). The authors would like to thank
Drs Larry Jordan, Michel Lemay and David Bashor for useful
comments and discussion. Ms Maria Setterbom and Ms
Sharon McCartney provided technical assistance with ﬁgure
preparation.

C(cid:2) 2006 The Authors. Journal compilation C(cid:2) 2006 The Physiological Society

